Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. Teacher Contracts
§ 21-7-110.
Suspension or dismissal of teachers; notice; hearing; independent hearing officer; board review and decision; appeal.

The board may suspend or dismiss any teacher, or terminate any continuing contract teacher, for any of the following reasons:

Incompetency;

Neglect of duty;

Immorality including, without limitation, engaging in conduct with a student which would be a violation of W.S.

6-2-314

through

6-2-318

, 12-6-101(a) or

35-7-1036

;

Insubordination;

Physical incapacity to perform job duties even with reasonable accommodation;

Failure to perform duties in a satisfactory manner;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 84, § 2.

Conviction of a felony; and

Any other good or just cause relating to the educational process.

Suspension or dismissal proceedings shall be initiated by the superintendent or any member of the board designated by the superintendent or designated by the board pursuant to a majority vote of the board delivering to the teacher a written notice of suspension or dismissal, together with written reasons.

Any continuing contract teacher receiving notice of a recommendation of termination under W.S. 21-7-106(a), or any teacher against whom dismissal or suspension proceedings are instituted, is entitled to a hearing before an independent hearing officer provided through the office of administrative hearings on the recommendation for termination or the reasons for dismissal or suspension, upon submission of a written request to the superintendent. The request for hearing shall be given within seven (7) days after receipt of notice of termination under W.S. 21-7-106(a) or after receiving notice of dismissal or suspension under subsection (b) of this section. Expenses of the hearing officer shall be paid by the school district in accordance with W.S. 9-2-2202(b)(ii).

Within five (5) days after selection, the hearing officer shall set the date for hearing and notify the teacher and superintendent of the hearing date, time and location. In no event shall the hearing commence on a date later than forty-five (45) days after notice under W.S. 21-7-106(a) or subsection (b) of this section, as applicable. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with contested case procedures specified under W.S. 9-2-2202(b). All school district records pertaining to the teacher shall be made available to the hearing officer.

At the hearing, the superintendent shall have the burden of proving that the recommendation for termination is based upon reasons provided in the notice of termination submitted pursuant to W.S. 21-7-106(a) or that suspension or dismissal is based upon reasons specified in the notice given under subsection (b) of this section, as applicable.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 182, § 2.

The board shall review the findings of fact and recommendation submitted by the hearing officer and within twenty (20) days after receipt, issue a written order to either terminate, suspend or dismiss the teacher, or to retain the teacher. If the board terminates, suspends or dismisses the teacher’s employment over a recommendation by the hearing officer for retention, the written order of the board shall include a conclusion together with reasons supported by the record. A copy of the order shall be provided to the teacher and a copy shall be entered into the school district records pertaining to the teacher. Any action by the board pursuant to this subsection shall be approved by a majority of the duly elected members of the board.

Appeals may be taken from the order of the board to the district court as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. An electronic recording of hearing proceedings may serve as the official transcript but upon appeal, the district court may request a written transcript of the proceedings or any portion of the proceedings. The cost of transcribing the record shall be borne equally by the teacher and the school district.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.9; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 160; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-160; 1993, ch. 219, § 1; 2011, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 101, § 1; 2013 ch. 167, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 179, § 2, effective March 9, 2015; 2019 ch. 84, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), made stylistic changes, in (a)(iii), added “including, without limitation, engaging in conduct with a student which would be a violation of W.S.

6-2-314

through

6-2-318

, 12-6-101(a) or

35-7-1036

,”added (a)(v) through (a)(ix); in (c), substituted “provided through the office of administrative hearings on the recommendation for termination” for “on the recommendation,” and substituted the present last sentence for the former third through last sentences which read: “The independent hearing officer shall insofar as possible, be impartial, experienced in education, labor and employment matters and in the conduct of hearings.
Within five (5) days following receipt of the hearing request, the superintendent and the teacher shall jointly select a hearing officer.
If they fail to agree upon selection, the district judge of the judicial district in which the school district is located shall upon request select a hearing officer. Expenses of the hearing officer shall be paid equally by the school district and the teacher”; in (d), substituted “contested case procedures under W.S. 9-2-2202(b)” for “the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the hearing officer may accordingly receive or reject evidence and testimony, administer oaths and if necessary, subpoena witnesses”; in (e), deleted “the teacher has the right to appear in person with or without counsel, to be heard, to present testimony or witnesses and all evidence bearing upon proposed termination, dismissal or suspension
and to cross-examine witnesses” after “At the hearing”; and repealed former (f), which read: “The hearing officer shall review the evidence and testimony, render written findings of fact and recommend the teacher be terminated, suspended or dismissed, or that the teacher be retained. The findings and recommendations shall be forwarded to the teacher, the superintendent and members of the board within twenty (20) days following conclusion of the hearing.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “Beginning school year 2013-2014 and each school year thereafter” in (a)(vii).

The 2013 amendment,

in (a)(vii), substituted “2016-2017” for “2013-2014,” deleted “annual” before “performance evaluation,” and added “for at least two (2) consecutive years.”

Laws 2013, ch. 167, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(vii) substituted “2019-2020” for “2016-2017.”

Laws 2015, ch. 179, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (a)(vii), which read: "Beginning school year 2019-2020 and each school year thereafter, inadequate performance as determined through performance evaluation tied to student academic growth for at least two (2) consecutive years completed in accordance with W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xvii) through (xix)."

Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Good or just cause to dismiss teacher.—

Board of trustees for a school district had before it substantial evidence of good or just cause relating to the educational process to dismiss a teacher because the teacher disciplined a student—who also happened to be the teacher’s child—by pulling and pushing the student in violation of the school district’s policies and standards, the incident bore a relationship to the teacher’s abilities as a teacher and substantially interfered with the orderly operation of the school, and progressive discipline was not required. Mirich v. State ex rel. Bd. of Trs., 2021 WY 32, 481 P.3d 627,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2021).

Construction. —

Phrase “notice
of termination” refers to the notice of recommendation of termination,
not to some final document issued by a board of trustees after reviewing
a hearing officer's suggested disposition of the case. Therefore,
a teacher was not entitled to compensation following the end of the
2011-12 school year after he was not reemployed because the term “notice
of termination” did not mean something other than notice of
recommendation of termination; the terms were used interchangeable
to designate a single document. Laramie Cnty. Sch. Dist. No. One ex rel. Bd. of Trs. v. Kinstler, 2015 WY 143, 361 P.3d 819,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2015).

Board's review of the hearing officer's decision. —

Although a school board's decision terminating a teacher was required to be based on consideration of the entire record received by a hearing officer, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

16-3-109

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

21-7-110

, there was no statutory or due process requirement that the school board personally and independently review the evidentiary record. Wadsworth v. Bd. of Trs. Sch. Dist. No. Two, 2014 WY 7, 316 P.3d 541,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2014).

Applicability of section to termination cases. —

This section applies to termination as well as dismissal and suspension cases. Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Rights and interests to be considered in the process of removing teacher. —

See Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

Guidelines for determining incompetency need not be fixed and published. —

The legislature has not prescribed guidelines for determination of incompetency, and has not required school boards to fix and make known a set of guidelines before it can make a finding of incompetency. Courts will not impose such a requirement. Barger v. Board of Trustees, 494 P.2d 544,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1972).

“Insubordination” defined. —

Insubordination is a constant or continuing intentional refusal to obey a direct or implied order, reasonable in nature, and given by and with proper authority. Board of Trustees v. Colwell, 611 P.2d 427,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1980).

Willful refusal to obey rules. —

“Insubordination” includes willful refusal of teacher to obey reasonable rules and regulations, with emphasis on the presence of a persistent course of willful defiance. Board of Trustees v. Holso, 584 P.2d 1009,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 587 P.2d 203,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1978); Board of Trustees v. Colwell, 611 P.2d 427,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1980).

“Good cause” cannot be just any reason

that the board deems sufficient for the discharge of the teacher. Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

It must bear reasonable relationship to teacher's fitness. —

Not only must there be “good cause” and substantial evidence in support of a charge against a teacher, but in order for the facts to sustain such a charge they must bear reasonable relationship to the teacher's fitness or capacity to perform his duties in that position. Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

The “good cause” to which this section refers assumes facts which bear a relationship to the teacher's ability and fitness to teach and discharge the duties of his or her position. Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

A failure to establish rapport with the students, by and of itself, is not “a good or just cause”

as required by this section as a matter of law. Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

A general charge of “inability to establish rapport with his students,” unsupported by definition and specific facts going straight to the charge, is insufficient, standing alone, to constitute “other good or just cause” under this section, or the good cause which is necessary to insulate the order of termination or dismissal against capriciousness and arbitrariness. Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

This section sets out specific provisions, in a dismissal case, as to procedure.

Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971).

But there is no comparable procedure statute for a termination case.

Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971) (but see Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983), annotated above).

Board members may be disqualified if unbiased majority remains. —

Notwithstanding that the school board is the designated hearing body, it requires only a majority of the board to act in a hearing to suspend or dismiss teachers. If an unbiased majority remains after some board members have been disqualified, the rule of necessity, which has been said to stand for the proposition that the board or its members may not be disqualified because it is the only tribunal with jurisdiction to hold the hearing, does not apply. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Teacher may not be found guilty of deficiency not charged. —

Where the only student-disciplinary issue of which a teacher was notified was a failure to follow the school board's policy with respect to discipline and, the board having made no finding concerning this charge, thereby leaving him to be presumed innocent thereof, the teacher may not later be found guilty of a student-disciplinary deficiency (unable to control conduct), with which he had not been charged. Powell v. Board of Trustees, 550 P.2d 1112,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1976).

Evidence of incompetency. —

In dismissing a continuing contract teacher for incompetency a school board may rely upon evaluations made by administrators, who are hired for purposes such as evaluating the work of teachers and administering school systems in general. Barger v. Board of Trustees, 494 P.2d 544,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1972).

It is within the prerogative of the trier of fact to decide what evidence is most dependable.

Barger v. Board of Trustees, 494 P.2d 544,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1972).

A witness' unsworn statement inconsistent with testimony given in a hearing only affects credibility of the witness. The sworn testimony of the principal which was given to the school board was competent and the board was entitled to believe him if it chose to do so despite the fact that the principal had previously recommended the allegedly incompetent teacher for employment elsewhere. Barger v. Board of Trustees, 494 P.2d 544,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1972).

Instruction given on theory that school teacher could not be discharged,

except pursuant to procedure in former statute, was prejudicial. Baird v. School Dist., 41 Wyo. 451, 287 P. 308,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1930).

Principal not properly discharged from position as classroom teacher. —

Inasmuch as the original notice to a school principal was insufficient to advise him of the standard rule or regulation he was alleged to have violated, and inasmuch as the hearing was not in reference to his classroom teacher tenured status, and inasmuch as there was not substantial evidence presented at the hearing to reflect “good or just cause” for his discharge as a classroom teacher — the evidence related to a five to 15 minute argument between the principal and two teachers during which accusations were exchanged, with the principal standing in the only exit to the room — the principal was not properly discharged from his position as classroom teacher. Spurlock v. Board of Trustees, 699 P.2d 270,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1985).

Stated

in

Roberts v. Lincoln County School Dist. Number One, 676 P.2d 577,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Kahrs v. Board of Trustees for Platte County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 901 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Dismissal or rejection of public school teacher because of disloyalty, 27 ALR2d 487.

Assertion of immunity as ground for discharge of teacher, 44 ALR2d 789.

What constitutes “incompetency” or “inefficiency” as a ground for dismissal or demotion of public school teacher, 4 ALR3d 1090.

Use of illegal drugs as ground for dismissal of teacher, or denial or cancellation of teacher's certificate, 47 ALR3d 754.

Sexual conduct as ground for dismissal of teacher or denial or revocation of teaching certificate, 78 ALR3d 19.

What constitutes “insubordination” as ground for dismissal of public school teacher, 78 ALR3d 83.

Dismissal of public school teacher because of unauthorized absence or tardiness, 78 ALR3d 117.

Public school teacher's self-defense, or defense of another, as justification, in dismissal proceedings, for use or threat of use of force against student, 37 ALR4th 842.

Sufficiency of notice of intention to discharge or not to rehire teacher, under statutes requiring such notice, 52 ALR4th 301.

§ 21-7-111.
Inapplicability of provisions.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit:

The transfer of a teacher within a school system to a position of equal or greater salary;

The retirement of a teacher in accordance with an established policy of retirement;

The reduction of a salary of a teacher as part of a general salary reduction applicable to at least fifty percent (50%) of the teachers employed by a school district;

The termination of the contract of a teacher at the end of current school year because of a decrease in the size of faculty due to decreased enrollment, combining of school districts or an event beyond the control of the board if notice of termination is given pursuant to W.S.

21-7-105

and 21-7-106(a) except the request for a hearing does not apply;

The termination of extra services or duties together with a corresponding termination of any pay for such extra services.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 182, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.10; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 161; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-161; Laws 1971, ch. 144, § 1; 1987, ch. 141, § 1; 1993, ch. 219, § 1; 1997, ch. 189, § 2; 2011, ch. 182, § 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, repealed former (b), which read: “Nothing in this article including the duty to provide a reason for termination of an initial contract teacher's employment, shall be interpreted as requiring any hearing or as requiring any proof of cause if school districts are not prohibited from providing by policy or contract, additional procedures or rights to initial contract teachers.”

Board may terminate teacher for financial reasons. —

A school board did not act arbitrarily or capriciously or abuse its discretion in terminating a continuing contract teacher due to limited financial resources and decreased enrollment. Palmer v. Board of Trustees, 785 P.2d 1160,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Lippincott v. Board of Trustees,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 98

, 3 P.3d 861 (Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to dismiss public school teacher on ground that services are no longer needed, 100 ALR2d 1141.

§ 21-7-112.
Effect on existing contracts.

The contracts of all teachers in the state of Wyoming from and after July 1, 2012, shall be subject to the policies, rules, and regulations of the school district not in conflict with this law or the other laws of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.10; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 162; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-162; 2011, ch. 182, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “July 1, 2012” for “the effective date of this act.”

Laws 2011, ch. 182, § 6 provides: “(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section this act is effective July 1, 2012.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act are effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2011.

Applied

in

Roberts v. Lincoln County School Dist. Number One, 676 P.2d 577,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1984).

§ 21-7-113.
Application to teachers presently employed.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all teachers who are teaching in Wyoming on and after July 1, 2012, and shall apply regardless of whether the teacher was employed prior to July 1, 2012 as a teacher in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 21-272.12; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 163; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-163; 2011, ch. 182, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “and after July 1, 2012, and shall apply regardless of whether the teacher was employed prior to July 1, 2012 as a teacher in” for “the effective date hereof; provided, however, the status of teachers covered under this act will be determined by their original date of employment as a teacher in the state of.”

Laws 2011, ch. 182, § 6, provides: “(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section this act is effective July 1, 2012.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act are effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2011.

This section refers to function of teaching,

not supervising. Seyfang v. Board of Trustees, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 21-7-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 182, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 182, § 13, related to designation by schools of continuing contract teachers.

Cited

in

Barger v. Board of Trustees, 494 P.2d 544,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1972); O'Melia v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist., 497 P.2d 540,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is “teacher” for purposes of tenure statute, 94 ALR3d 141.